Missouri, session 2026, HB2619.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 301, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto two new sections, to be
known as sections 301.3181 and 301.3182, to read as follows:
301.3181. Any person who served as a member of the Armed Forces of the
United States in Afghanistan and Iraq and was awarded the Afghanistan Campaign
medal and the Iraq Campaign medal may apply for Afghanistan and Iraq Veteran
vehicle license plates for any motor vehicle the person owns, either solely or jointly,
other than an apportioned motor vehicle or a commercial motor vehicle licensed in
excess of twenty-four thousand pounds gross weight. Any such person shall make
application for the license plates authorized by this section on a form provided by the
director of revenue and furnish such proof of service in Afghanistan and Iraq, the
awarding of the Afghanistan Campaign medal and the Iraq Campaign medal, and
status as currently serving in a branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or as an
honorably discharged veteran as the director may require. Upon presentation of the
proof of eligibility, payment of a fifteen-dollar fee in addition to the regular registration
fees, and presentation of documents that may be required by law, the director shall then
issue license plates bearing letters or numbers or a combination thereof, as determined
by the director, with the words "AFGHANISTAN & IRAQ VETERAN" in place of the
words "SHOW-ME STATE". Such plates shall bear the Afghanistan Campaign medal
and the Iraq Campaign medal on the left side, with the Afghanistan Campaign medal
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2619 2
appearing farthest to the left and the Iraq Campaign medal appearing immediately to
the right of the Afghanistan Campaign medal. Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 301.144, no additional fee shall be charged for the personalization of license
plates issued pursuant to this section. The plates shall be clearly visible at night and
shall be aesthetically attractive, as prescribed by section 301.130. There shall be no limit
on the number of license plates any person qualified pursuant to this section may obtain
so long as each set of license plates issued pursuant to this section is issued for a vehicle
owned solely or jointly by such person. License plates issued pursuant to this section
shall not be transferable to any other person, except that any registered co-owner of the
motor vehicle may operate the motor vehicle for the duration of the year licensed in the
event of the death of the qualified person.
301.3182. Any person who served as a member of the Armed Forces of the
United States in Afghanistan and was awarded the Afghanistan Campaign medal may
apply for Afghanistan Veteran vehicle license plates for any motor vehicle the person
owns, either solely or jointly, other than an apportioned motor vehicle or a commercial
motor vehicle licensed in excess of twenty-four thousand pounds gross weight. Any such
person shall make application for the license plates authorized by this section on a form
provided by the director of revenue and furnish such proof of service in Afghanistan,
the awarding of the Afghanistan Campaign medal, and status as currently serving in a
branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or as an honorably discharged veteran
as the director may require. Upon presentation of the proof of eligibility, payment of a
fifteen-dollar fee in addition to the regular registration fees, and presentation of
documents that may be required by law, the director shall then issue license plates
bearing letters or numbers or a combination thereof, as determined by the director, with
the words "AFGHANISTAN VETERAN" in place of the words "SHOW-ME STATE".
Such plates shall bear the Afghanistan Campaign medal on the left side.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 301.144, no additional fee shall be charged
for the personalization of license plates issued pursuant to this section. The plates shall
be clearly visible at night and shall be aesthetically attractive, as prescribed by section
301.130. There shall be no limit on the number of license plates any person qualified
pursuant to this section may obtain so long as each set of license plates issued pursuant
to this section is issued for a vehicle owned solely or jointly by such person. License
plates issued pursuant to this section shall not be transferable to any other person,
except that any registered co-owner of the motor vehicle may operate the motor vehicle
for the duration of the year licensed in the event of the death of the qualified person.
✔